Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.190

Claims enforceable against commission assets—Nonliability of other persons and entities—Exception—Application of chapter 4.92 RCW.

Obligations incurred by the commission and any other liabilities or claims against the commission shall be enforced only against the assets of the commission, and, except to the extent of such assets, no liability for the debts or actions of the commission exists against either the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or against any member, employee, or agent of the commission in his or her individual capacity. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, neither the members of the commission nor its employees may be held individually responsible for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, save for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee may be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission. The liability of the members of the commission shall be several and not joint, and no member is liable for the default of any other member. This provision confirms that commissioners have been, and continue to be, state officers or volunteers for purposes of RCW 4.92.075 and are entitled to the defenses, indemnifications, limitations of liability, and other protections and benefits of chapter 4.92 RCW, as provided in that chapter.

[ 2004 c 178 s 14; 1987 c 393 s 4; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.190. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 7; RRS s 2874-7.]